Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $150,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for a new University of Minnesota Extension full-time equivalent staff position to support farmer-lender mediation under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 583. new text end